Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.260

Monitoring enrollee level in basic health plan and medicaid caseload of children—Funding levels adjustment.

The health care authority and the office of financial management shall together monitor the enrollee level in the basic health plan and the medicaid caseload of children. The office of financial management shall adjust the funding levels by interagency reimbursement of funds between the basic health plan and medicaid and adjust the funding levels for the health care authority to maximize combined enrollment.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 15 s 71; 2009 c 479 s 28; 1995 c 265 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—Report—Agency transfer—References to head of health care authority—Draft legislation—2011 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 74.09.010.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Captions not law—Effective dates—Savings—Severability—1995 c 265: See notes following RCW 70.47.015.